Utah statutes.
63H-1-203.   Levy of a municipal tax.

Any levy of a municipal energy tax, a telecommunications tax, a transient room tax, or a resort communities tax, including any increase in the applicable tax rate, requires the affirmative vote of:

(1)  the authority board; and

(2)  a majority of all elected members of the authority board.



Amended by Chapter 9, 2010 General Session

